Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1. There is appropriated to the Bureau  of Labor and Industries, for the
biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the General Fund, the amount of $35,167,209.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$40,452,909 is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit  for
payment of  expenses from fees, moneys or other revenues, including Miscellaneous Receipts,
but excluding lottery funds and federal funds, collected or received by  the Bureau of Labor
and Industries.
SECTION 3. For the biennium beginning  July 1, 2025, expenditures by the Bureau of La-
bor and Industries for wage claim payments from the Wage Security Fund are not limited.
SECTION 4. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures,  the amount of
$2,366,174 is  established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for
payment of  expenses from federal funds collected or received by the Bureau of Labor and
Industries.
SECTION 5. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the amount of  $307,006
is established for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, as the maximum limit for payment
of expenses from lottery moneys allocated from  the Veterans’ Services Fund established
under ORS 406.140  to the Bureau of Labor and Industries for the purpose of implementing
the provisions of ORS 660.220.
SECTION 6.
This 2025 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2025 Act takes effect
July 1, 2025.
Enrolled House Bill 5015 (HB 5015-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 26, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5015 (HB 5015-A) Page 2